Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1083.01
Reductions in school district budget; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any reductions in a school district budget, made to comply with the budget limitation in the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, affect classroom expenses as a last resort.

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 6.

Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.